Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska17-971
Water service districts; improvements; protest; effect; special assessments.

If a governing body deems it necessary or desirable to make improvements in a water service district, it shall by ordinance create such water service district and, after the passage, approval, and publication of such ordinance, shall publish notice of the creation of such district for two consecutive weeks in a legal newspaper in or of general circulation in the city or village. If a majority of the resident owners of the property directly abutting upon any water main to be constructed within such water service district shall file with the city clerk or the village clerk within twenty days after the first publication of such notice written objections to the creation of such district, such improvement shall not be made as provided in such ordinance, but such ordinance shall be repealed. If such objections are not so filed against the district, the governing body shall immediately cause such work to be done or such improvement to be made, shall contract for the work or improvement, and shall levy special assessments on the lots and parcels of land within such district or districts specially benefited in proportion to such benefits in order to pay the cost of such improvement.

Laws 1967, c. 73, § 2, p. 237;

Laws 1986, LB 960, § 10;

Laws 2015, LB361, § 38;

Laws 2017, LB133, § 302.